Hawaii statutes.
[§155D-2.5] Grants; qualified feed
developer. (a) Applications for grants submitted by qualified feed
developers shall be submitted on a form furnished by the department and shall
be filed with accompanying documentation of feed development costs; provided
that:

(1) The applicant shall comply with applicable
federal and state laws prohibiting discrimination against any person on the
basis of race, color, national origin, religion, creed, sex, age, sexual
orientation, or disability;

(2) The applicant shall have applied for or received
any applicable licenses or permits;

(3) The applicant shall indemnify and hold harmless
the State and its officers, agents, and employees from all claims arising out
of or resulting from the feed sold;

(4) The grant shall not exceed a total of $200,000
per qualified feed developer per year; and

(5) The department may request an applicant to
provide any necessary information for the purposes of verifying actual sales to
qualified producers.

(b) Documentation of animal feed development
costs, as requested by the department, shall be filed for feed sold to
qualified producers within the immediately preceding fiscal quarter of the
filing and shall be effective for feed development costs incurred after July 1,
2016.

(c) The applicant shall submit a quarterly
financial statement of revenues and expenses along with other supporting
documents as deemed necessary by the department and filed with the
documentation of the feed development costs. An annual financial statement shall
be filed with the department within ninety days following the close of the
business' fiscal year, for final reconciliation of any reimbursement paid
during the previous three quarters within the fiscal year. The financial
statement shall be certified as accurate by the applicant and the preparer of
the financial statement on forms prepared by the department.

(d) Funds shall be disbursed upon approval by
the department to the qualified feed developer for up to fifty per cent of the
development costs of feed sold to qualified producers, as verified by a
certified public accountant.

(e) In no case shall costs be reimbursed to a
qualified feed developer when, after evaluation and verification by the
department, the department determines that the amount of reimbursement will
result in an annual profit of more than ten per cent.

(f) The department shall aggregate the total
grant applications pursuant to this section and divide and distribute the
available grant funds on a pro rata basis. [L 2016, c 221, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next